hr-HR: Tehnologija hlađenja: Aktivno; Zrak; Puhanje; Zatvorena petlja; Izravno hlađenje; Dvostruki ventilator; Ventilator; Toplinska cijev; Procesorski hladnjak; Hibridna; Tekućina; Micro-fin; Otvorena petlja; Pasivna; Peltier; Promjena faze; Radijator; Toranj; Parna komora; Voda; Ostalo
nl: Koeltechnologie: Actief; Lucht; Blazer; Gesloten kring; Direct-to-die; Dubbele ventilator; Ventilator; Warmteleiding; Koellichaam; Hybride; Vloeistof; Micro-fin; Open-loop; Passief; Peltier; Faseverandering; Radiator; Toren; Dampkamer; Water; Andere
da: Køleteknologi: Aktiv; Luft; Blæser; Lukket kredsløb; Direkte; Dobbelt blæser; Vifte; Varmerør; Varmebad; Hybrid; Væske; Mikrofinne; Åben sløjfe; Passiv; Peltier; Fase-skifter; Radiator; Tårn; Dampkammer; Vand; Andet
fi: Jäähdytystekniikka: Aktiivinen; Ilma; Puhallin; Suljettu silmukka; suorasuulak; Kaksoistuuletin; Viuhka; Lämmitysputki; Jäähdytyselementti; Hybridi; Nestemäinen; Mikroevä; Avoin silmukka; Passiivinen; Peltier; Vaiheen muutos; Jäähdytin; Torni; Höyrykammio; Vesi; Muu
zh-CN: 散热技术: 活动型; 空气; 吹风机; 闭环; 直触冷头; 双风扇; 风扇; 热管; 散热设备; 混合型; 液体; 微肋; 开环; 被动; 珀耳帖; 相变; 散热器; 塔式; 均热板; 饮用水/纯净水; 其他
en: Cooling technology: Active; Air; Blower; Closed-loop; Direct-to-die; Dual-fan; Fan; Heat pipe; Heat sink; Hybrid; Liquid; Micro-fin; Open-loop; Passive; Peltier; Phase-change; Radiator; Tower; Vapor chamber; Water; Other
ro-RO: Tehnologie de răcire: Activă; Aer; Suflantă; Circuit închis; Direct-to-die; Ventilator dublu; Ventilator; Conductă de căldură; Radiator; Hibrid; Lichid; Micro-fin; Circuit deschis; Pasivă; Peltier; Schimbare de faze; Radiator; Turn; Camera de vapori; Apă; Altele
sl-SI: Tehnologija hlajenja: Aktivna; Zrak; Puhalo; Zaprta zanka; Neposredno s tekočino; Dvojni ventilator; Ventilator; Toplotna cev; Hladilnik; Hibridno; Tekočina; Micro-fin; Odprta zanka; Pasivna; Peltier; Fazna sprememba; Radiator; Stolp; Parna komora; Voda; Drugo
sv: Kylteknik: Aktiv; Luft; Blåsare; Sluten slinga; Direct-to-die; Dubbla fläktar; Fläkt; Värmeledning; Kylfläns; Hybrid; Vätska; Mikrofena; Öppen slinga; Passiv; Peltier; Fasbyte; Radiator; Torn; Ångkammare; Vatten; Övrigt
es: Tecnología de refrigeración: Activo; Aire; Soplador; Bucle cerrado; Directo al troquel; Ventilador doble; Ventilador; Tubo de calor; Disipador de calor; Híbrido; Líquido; Microaleta; Bucle abierto; Pasivo; Peltier; Cambio de fase; Radiator; Torre; Cámara de vapor; Agua; Otros
el: Τεχνολογία ψύξης: Ενεργή; Αέρα; Φυσητήρας; Κλειστός βρόχος; Απευθείας στη μήτρα; Διπλός ανεμιστήρας; Τύπου βεντάλιας; Σωλήνας θερμότητας; Ψύκτρα θερμότητας; Υβριδικό; Υγρό; Μικρών πτερυγίων; Ανοιχτός βρόχος; Παθητική; Peltier; Αλλαγής φάσης; Καλοριφέρ; Πύργος; Θάλαμος ατμού; Νερό; Άλλο
vi: Công nghệ làm mát: Chủ động; Không khí; Máy quạt; Vòng lặp khép kín; Trực tiếp vào khuôn; Quạt kép; Đầu xòe; Ống sưởi; Bộ tản nhiệt; Ván kết hợp; Liquid; Vây siêu nhỏ; Vòng lặp mở; Thụ động; Sò nóng lạnh; Thay đổi pha; Máy sưởi; Dạng tháp; Buồng hơi; Nước; Khác
lt-LT: Aušinimo technologija: Aktyvus; Oras; Pūstuvas; Uždaro ciklo; „Direct-to-die“; Dvigubas ventiliatorius; Ventiliatorius; Šilumos vamzdis; Aušinimo radiatorius; Hibridinė; Skystis; „Micro-fin“ plokštė; Atviro ciklo; Pasyvus; „Peltier“ modulis; Fazės keitimas; Radiatorius; Bokštinis; Garų kamera; Vanduo; Kita
ja: 冷却技術: アクティブ; 空気; ブロワー; クローズドループ; ダイ直冷; デュアルファン; ファン; ヒートパイプ; ヒートシンク; ハイブリッド; リキッド; マイクロフィン; オープンループ; パッシブ; ペルチェ; 相転移; ラジエーター; タワー; ベーパーチャンバー; 水; その他
cs: Technologie chlazení: Aktivní; Vzduch; Dmychadlo; Uzavřený okruh; Přímé chlazení; Dvouventilátor; Vějířový; Tepelná trubice; Vzduchem chlazený chladič; Hybridní; Kapalina; Chladič s mikro drážkovaným žebrem; Otevřená smyčka; Pasivní; Peltierův článek; Změna fáze; Chladič; Věž; Odpařovací komora; Voda; Jiné
tr: Soğutma Teknolojisi: Aktif; Hava; Hava üfleyici; Kapalı döngü; Doğrudan öldürme; Çift fan; Fan; Isı borusu; Isı emici; Hibrit; Sıvı; Mikro kanatçık; Açık döngü; Pasif; Peltier; Faz değişimi; Radyatör; Kule; Buhar odası; Su; Diğer
pl: Technologia chłodzenia: Aktywna; Powietrze; Dmuchawa; Pętla zamknięta; Direct-to-die; Podwójny wentylator; Wentylator; Ciepłowód; Radiator; Hybrydowy; Płyn; Micro-fin; Otwarta pętla; Pasywny; Ogniwo Peltiera; Zmiana fazy; Radiator; Wieża; Komora parowa; Woda; Inne
th: เทคโนโลยีระบายความร้อน: แบบแอกทีฟ; อากาศ; เครื่องเป่าลม; ระบบแบบปิด; ไม่ใช้กระดอง; พัดลมสองตัว; ทรงพัด; ท่อความร้อน; แผงระบายความร้อน; แบบไฮบริด; แบบเหลว; ไมโครฟิน; ระบบแบบเปิด; แบบพาสซีฟ; แผ่นเพลเทียร์; การเปลี่ยนเฟส; หม้อน้ำ; ทาวเวอร์; ระบายความร้อนด้วยไอน้ำ; น้ำ; อื่นๆ
fr: Technologie de refroidissement: Actif; A air; Ventilateur; Boucle fermée; Couple direct; Double ventilateur; Ventilateur; Conduit de chaleur; Dissipateurs de chaleur; Hybrid; Liquide; Micro-fin; Boucle ouverte; Passif; Peltier; Changement de phase; Radiateur; Tour; Chambre à vapeur; Eau; Autre
bg-BG: Технология за охлаждане: Активна; Въздушна; Вентилатор; Затворена верига; Direct-to-die; Двоен вентилатор; Вентилатор; Топлинна тръба; Топлообменник; Хибридна; Течност; Микроперка; Отворена верига; Пасивна; Пелтие; Промяна на фазата; Радиатор; Кула; Парна камера; Вода; Други
pt-BR: Tecnologia de resfriamento: Ativo; Ar; Ventilador; Circuito fechado; Direct-die; Dual-fan; Ventilador; Tubo térmico; Dissipador de calor; Híbrida; Líquido; Micro-fin; Open-loop; Passivo; Peltier; Mudança de fase; Radiador; Torre; Câmara de vapor; Água; Outro
de: Kühltechnologie: Aktiv; Luft; Gebläse; Geschlossener Kreislauf; Direkt zur Düse; Dual-Lüfter; Fächer; Wärmerohr; Kühlkörper; Hybrid; Flüssig; Mikrorippen; Offener Kreislauf; Passiv; Peltier; Phasenwechsel; Kühler; Turm; Vapor-Chamber; Wasser; Sonstiges
hu: Hűtési technológia: Aktív; Levegő; Befúvó; Zárt rendszerű; Közvetlen; Kétventilátoros; Ventilátor; Csővezeték; Hűtőborda; Hibrid; Folyadék; Mikrocsövek; Nyitott rendszerű; Passzív; Peltier; Fázisváltó; Radiátor; Torony; Gőzkamra; Víz; Egyéb
it: Tecnologia di raffreddamento: Attivo; Aria; Soffiatore; Ciclo chiuso; Diretto; Doppia ventola; Ventola; Conduttura di riscaldamento; Radiatore; Ibrido; Liquido; Microfin; A circuito aperto; Passivo; Peltier; Cambio fase; Radiatore; Torre; Camera di vapore; Acqua; Altro
zh-TW: 冷卻技術: 主動; 空氣; 鼓風機; 閉環; Direct-to-die; 雙風扇; 扇型; 熱管; 散熱器; 混合; 液態; 微鰭片; 開環; 被動式; 帕爾帖效應; 相變; 散熱床; 塔形; 均溫板; 水; 其他
ko: 냉각 기술: 액티브; 공기; 블로워; 폐쇄 루프; 다이렉트 투 다이; 듀얼 팬; 팬; 히트파이프; 히트싱크; 하이브리드; 액상; 마이크로 핀; 개방 루프; 수동; 펠티어; 상변화; 라디에이터; 타워; 베이퍼 챔버; 물; 기타
nb: Kjøleteknologi: Aktiv; Luft; Blåser; Lukket krets; Direct-to-die; Dobbelvifte; Vifte; Varmerør; Kjøleribbe; Hybrid; Væske; Micro-fin; Åpen løkke; Passiv; Peltier; Faseendring; Radiator; Tårn; Dampkammer; Vann; Annet
sk-SK: Technológia chladenia: Aktívny; Vzduch; Dúchadlo; Uzavretá slučka; Priamo do formy; Dvojitý ventilátor; Ventilátor; Tepelné potrubie; Chladič; Hybridný; Kvapalina; Micro-fin; Otvorená slučka; Pasívny; Peltier; Zmena fázy; Radiátor; Veža; Parná komora; Voda; Iné
ru: Технология охлаждения: Активный; Воздушный; Воздуходувка; Замкнутый контур; Прямой на кристалл; Двойной вентилятор; Вентилятор; Тепловая трубка; Радиатор; Гибридные; Жидкостный; Микро пластина; Открытый контур; Пассивный; Пельтье; Фазовый переход; Радиатор; Башня; Паровая камера; Вода; Другое
pt-PT: Tecnologia de refrigeração: Ativo; Ar; Ventilador; Circuito fechado; Direto à matriz; Ventoinha dupla; Leque; Tubo de calor; Dissipador de calor; Híbrido; Líquido; Micro-fin; Sistema aberto; Passivo; Peltier; Mudança de fase; Radiador; Torre; Câmara de vapor; Água; Outro